test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-3lex_haaitis_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Adjective - hääitis: # 2A v-k-v, t->tt, ää->á, i >á, VV > V A_VEESKIR
    hääitis+A+Sg+Nom: hääitis
    hääitis+A+Attr: häitis 
    hääitis+A+Sg+Gen: háittás
    hääitis+A+Sg+Acc: háittás
    hääitis+A+Sg+Ill: háittásân
    hääitis+A+Sg+Loc: háittásist
    hääitis+A+Sg+Com: háittásáin
    hääitis+A+Sg+Abe: háittásttáá
    hääitis+A+Ess: häitisin
    hääitis+A+Par: häitisid
    hääitis+A+Pl+Nom: háittáseh
    hääitis+A+Pl+Gen: háittásij
    hääitis+A+Pl+Acc: háittásijd
    hääitis+A+Pl+Ill: háittásáid
    hääitis+A+Pl+Loc: háittásijn
    hääitis+A+Pl+Com: háittásijguin
    hääitis+A+Pl+Abe: háittásijttáá

    hääitis+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: háittásub
    hääitis+A+Comp+Sg+Gen: háittásub
    hääitis+A+Comp+Sg+Acc: háittásub
    hääitis+A+Comp+Sg+Ill: háittásuubon
    hääitis+A+Comp+Sg+Loc: háittásubboost
    hääitis+A+Comp+Sg+Com: háittásubboin
    hääitis+A+Comp+Sg+Abe: háittásubttáá
    hääitis+A+Comp+Pl+Nom: háittásuboh
    hääitis+A+Comp+Pl+Gen: háittásuboi
    hääitis+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: háittásubboid # -boid
    hääitis+A+Comp+Pl+Ill: háittásubboid
    hääitis+A+Comp+Pl+Loc: háittásubboin
    hääitis+A+Comp+Pl+Com: háittásuboiguin
    hääitis+A+Comp+Pl+Abe: háittásuboittáá
    hääitis+A+Comp+Ess: háittásubbon
    hääitis+A+Comp+Par: háittásubbod

    hääitis+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: háittásumos
    hääitis+A+Superl+Sg+Gen: háittásumos
    hääitis+A+Superl+Sg+Acc: háittásumos
    hääitis+A+Superl+Sg+Ill: háittásumosân
    hääitis+A+Superl+Sg+Loc: háittásumosist
    hääitis+A+Superl+Sg+Com: háittásumosáin
    hääitis+A+Superl+Sg+Abe: háittásumosttáá
    hääitis+A+Superl+Pl+Nom: háittásumoseh
    hääitis+A+Superl+Pl+Gen: háittásumosij
    hääitis+A+Superl+Pl+Acc: háittásumosijd
    hääitis+A+Superl+Pl+Ill: háittásumosáid
    hääitis+A+Superl+Pl+Loc: háittásumosijn
    hääitis+A+Superl+Pl+Com: háittásumosijguin
    hääitis+A+Superl+Pl+Abe: háittásumosijttáá
    hääitis+A+Superl+Ess: háittásumosin
    hääitis+A+Superl+Par: háittásumosid

  Adjective - hurskes: # 2A A_VEESKIR
    hurskes+A+Sg+Nom: hurskes
    hurskes+A+Attr: hurskes 
    hurskes+A+Sg+Gen: hurskás
    hurskes+A+Sg+Acc: hurskás
    hurskes+A+Sg+Ill: hurskásân
    hurskes+A+Sg+Loc: hurskásist
    hurskes+A+Sg+Com: hurskásáin
    hurskes+A+Sg+Abe: hurskásttáá
    hurskes+A+Ess:    hurskesin
    hurskes+A+Par:    hurskesid
    hurskes+A+Pl+Nom: hurskáseh
    hurskes+A+Pl+Gen: hurskásij
    hurskes+A+Pl+Acc: hurskásijd
    hurskes+A+Pl+Ill: hurskásáid
    hurskes+A+Pl+Loc: hurskásijn
    hurskes+A+Pl+Com: hurskásijguin
    hurskes+A+Pl+Abe: hurskásijttáá

    hurskes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: hurskásub
    hurskes+A+Comp+Sg+Gen: hurskásub
    hurskes+A+Comp+Sg+Acc: hurskásub
    hurskes+A+Comp+Sg+Ill: hurskásuubon
    hurskes+A+Comp+Sg+Loc: hurskásubboost
    hurskes+A+Comp+Sg+Com: hurskásubboin
    hurskes+A+Comp+Sg+Abe: hurskásubttáá
    hurskes+A+Comp+Pl+Nom: hurskásuboh
    hurskes+A+Comp+Pl+Gen: hurskásuboi
    hurskes+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: hurskásubboid
    hurskes+A+Comp+Pl+Ill: hurskásubboid
    hurskes+A+Comp+Pl+Loc: hurskásubboin
    hurskes+A+Comp+Pl+Com: hurskásuboiguin
    hurskes+A+Comp+Pl+Abe: hurskásuboittáá
    hurskes+A+Comp+Ess: hurskásubbon
    hurskes+A+Comp+Par: hurskásubbod

    hurskes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: hurskásumos
    hurskes+A+Superl+Sg+Gen: hurskásumos
    hurskes+A+Superl+Sg+Acc: hurskásumos
    hurskes+A+Superl+Sg+Ill: hurskásumosân
    hurskes+A+Superl+Sg+Loc: hurskásumosist
    hurskes+A+Superl+Sg+Com: hurskásumosáin
    hurskes+A+Superl+Sg+Abe: hurskásumosttáá
    hurskes+A+Superl+Pl+Nom: hurskásumoseh
    hurskes+A+Superl+Pl+Gen: hurskásumosij
    hurskes+A+Superl+Pl+Acc: hurskásumosijd
    hurskes+A+Superl+Pl+Ill: hurskásumosáid
    hurskes+A+Superl+Pl+Loc: hurskásumosijn
    hurskes+A+Superl+Pl+Com: hurskásumosijguin
    hurskes+A+Superl+Pl+Abe: hurskásumosijttáá
    hurskes+A+Superl+Ess: hurskásumosin
    hurskes+A+Superl+Par: hurskásumosid
